Hawaii statutes.
§14-26 Assembly of electors at state
capital; time. The electors chosen shall assemble at the state capital on
the first Monday after the second Wednesday in December next following their
election, at two o'clock in the afternoon. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next